District of Columbia statutes.
31-3135

Claims payment report.

A health insurer shall include with its annual report filed with the Commissioner a claims payment report to include the:

(1)

Number of claims received in the previous calendar year;

(2)

Number of claims denied in the previous calendar year;

(3)

Number of claims paid:

(A)

In the previous calendar year;

(B)

In 30 days;

(C)

In 60 days;

(D)

In 120 days; and

(E)

In more than 120 days; and

(4)

Average number of days to pay a claim submitted in the previous calendar year.

July 23, 2002, D.C. Law 14-176, § 6, 49 DCR 5086
This section is referenced in § 31-3138.